Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-228
Authority; chairperson; officers; expenses.

The Director of Economic Development shall be the chairperson of the authority. The members shall elect from among the membership a vice-chairperson and such other officers as they may determine. Members shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for actual, necessary, and reasonable expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 28;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 30.